Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB90.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7383.1(g)(1) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7383.1. Curriculum, training and education certification management system.* * *(b.1) Entry level training and testing .--Fire and emergency services training at the Firefighter I level established under this section shall provide the following testing options to trainees:(1) a cumulative test to be completed at the end of the fire and emergency services training program; or123456789101112131415161718 (2) a test to be completed following a successive training module of the program, provided that all individual tests are completed in the same National Fire Protection Association accreditation standard period.* * *(g) Annual reports.--(1) The commissioner shall prepare an annual report on the training and education certification management system. The report shall include all of the following information:(i) The total number of firefighters in the system, delineated between paid and volunteer firefighter.(ii) The number of firefighters under subparagraph (i) who took a course on the system during the previous year.(iii) The number of firefighters under subparagraph (i) who are certified as Firefighter [1] I, Firefighter [2] II, Fire Instructor [1] I or Fire Officer [1] I.(iv) A summary of courses that were taken by firefighters under subparagraph (i).(v) A summary of how the funds under this section were expended.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250SB0090PN0045 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223